Rhode Island, session 2025, SB170.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-1-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-1 entitled "Department
of Health" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-1-17. Additional general powers.
(a) In addition to the other powers given to the director of health or the department of health
by other provisions of the general laws, and in order to permit the director to properly perform the
duties given to him or her by the general assembly, and to enforce the rules and regulations the
director is authorized to promulgate and adopt, the director is further authorized to promulgate and
adopt rules and regulations for the establishment of information collection, minimum sanitary
requirements, and other duties given to the director by § 23-1-1 or by any other provision of law,
and to enforce those rules and regulations. The director is further authorized to issue licenses or
permits, and to revoke, suspend, or annul them, to aid in the enforcement of those rules and
regulations.
(b) In the event of a public health emergency, the director is authorized to grant a temporary
Rhode Island healthcare provider license for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days and limited to
those healthcare providers who hold an active valid license in another state. The director is
authorized to promulgate and adopt rules and regulations to establish a process for this temporary
emergency license.
(c) In the event an application for professional licensure is delayed as a result of a board of
licensure’s inability to establish a quorum, the director shall have the authority to review and issue

licenses for any pending applications pursuant to all applicable rules and regulations.
(1) Review of applications by the director shall apply to those boards that have business
pending but have been unable to establish a quorum for more than thirty (30) business days.
(2) The authority granted by this subsection shall not extend to any pending disciplinary
actions.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001056/SUB A
========
LC001056/SUB A - Page 2 of 3